Utah statutes.
16-6a-119.   Execution against a mutual benefit corporation.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Judicial lien" means one or more of the following:
(i)  a judgment lien; or
(ii)  other lien obtained by a judicial or equitable process or proceeding.
(b)  "Water right" means:
(i)  a right to use water evidenced by a means identified in Section 73-1-10;
or
(ii)  a right to use water under an approved application:
(A)  to appropriate;
(B)  for a change of use; or
(C)  for the exchange of water.
(c)  "Water rights and related assets" means a water right or title to:
(i)  a water conveyance facility; or
(ii)  other asset of a mutual benefit corporation necessary to divert or
distribute water to its members.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a court may not do the following
with regard to a judicial lien recorded on or after May 12, 2009 against the
water rights and related assets of a mutual benefit corporation earlier than
180 days after the day on which the judicial lien is recorded or takes effect:
(a)  execute the judicial lien;
(b)  impose a levy as a result of the judicial lien; or
(c)  force the sale, transfer, or change in ownership of the water rights and
related assets pursuant to the judicial lien.
(3)  This section does not apply to a judicial lien related to a cause of
action brought against a mutual benefit corporation by a shareholder under
Section 73-3-3.5.
